Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.150

ESD board—Members—Qualifications, oath, bond—Organization—Quorum.

Every candidate for membership on a educational service district board shall be a registered voter and a resident of the board-member district for which such candidate files. On or before the date for taking office, every member shall make an oath or affirmation to support the Constitution of the United States and the state of Washington and to faithfully discharge the duties of the office according to the best of such member's ability. The members of the board shall not be required to give bond unless so directed by the superintendent of public instruction. At the first meeting of newly elected members and after the qualification for office of the newly elected members, each educational service district board shall reorganize by electing a chair and a vice chair. A majority of all of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

[ 2006 c 263 s 609; 1990 c 33 s 275; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 22; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 12; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.21.050, 28.19.520.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.